Maryland, session 2025, SB0018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
10–301.1.
(a) Except as provided under Title 9, Subtitle 3 of this article, during any
regularly scheduled primary or general election a voter may vote:
(1) in the voter’s assigned precinct on election day; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0018*

SENATE BILL 18
(2) at an early voting center in the voter’s county of residence on any early
voting day in accordance with this section.
(d) Each early voting center shall be open for voting as follows:
(1) beginning the second Thursday before a primary or general election
through the [Thursday] SECOND MONDAY before the election; and
(2) during the hours between 7 a.m. and 8 p.m. each early voting day.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.